Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB370.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part I of Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 11UNIFORM ELECTRONIC RECORDATION OFCUSTODIAL INTERROGATIONS ACTSec.1101. Short title of chapter.1102. Definitions.1103. Electronic recording requirement.1104. Notice and consent not required.1105. Exception for exigent circumstances.1106. Exception for individual's refusal to be recorded 12345678910111213141516171819 electronically.1107. Exception for interrogation conducted by other jurisdiction.1108. Exception based on belief recording not required.1109. Exception for safety of individual or protection of identity.1110. Exception for equipment malfunction.1111. Burden of persuasion.1112. Notice of intent to introduce unrecorded statement.1113. Procedural remedies.1114. Handling and preserving electronic recording.1115. Regulations relating to electronic recording.1116. Limitation of liability.1117. Self-authentication.1118. (Reserved).1119. Uniformity of application and construction.1120. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.§ 1101. Short title of chapter.This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Electronic Recordation of Custodial Interrogations Act.§ 1102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions)."Crime of violence." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses). The term includes a violent delinquent act.20250SB0370PN0318 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Custodial interrogation." Questioning or other conduct by a law enforcement officer which:(1) is reasonably likely to elicit an incriminating response from an individual; and(2) occurs when a reasonable individual in the same circumstances would consider that the individual is in custody.The term includes giving a required warning, advice of rights of the individual being questioned and waiver of rights by the individual."Electronic recording." A video recording, with audio, which accurately and completely records a custodial interrogation."Law enforcement agency." A governmental entity or person authorized by a governmental entity or state law to enforce criminal laws or investigate suspected criminal activity. The term includes a nongovernmental entity which has been delegated the authority to enforce criminal laws or investigate suspected criminal activity. The term does not include a law enforcement officer."Law enforcement officer." Any of the following:(1) An individual who is employed by a law enforcement agency and whose responsibilities include enforcing criminal laws or investigating suspected criminal activity.(2) An individual acting at the request or direction of an individual described in paragraph (1)."Person." Any of the following:(1) An individual, corporation, business trust, statutory trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture or public corporation.20250SB0370PN0318 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality.(3) Any other legal or commercial entity."Record electronically." To make an electronic recording."State." A state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States."Statement." A communication, whether oral, written, electronic or nonverbal."Violent delinquent act." An offense by a child which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a crime of violence.§ 1103. Electronic recording requirement.(a) Requirement.--(1) Except as specified in paragraph (2) or subsection (e), a law enforcement officer shall record electronically, in its entirety, a custodial interrogation related to a crime of violence.(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply as described in section:(i) 1105 (relating to exception for exigent circumstances);(ii) 1106 (relating to exception for individual's refusal to be recorded electronically);(iii) 1107 (relating to exception for interrogation conducted by other jurisdiction);(iv) 1108 (relating to exception based on belief recording not required);(v) 1109 (relating to exception for safety of individual or protection of identity); or20250SB0370PN0318 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) 1110 (relating to exception for equipment malfunction).(b) Justification report.--(1) This subsection applies if a law enforcement officer:(i) conducts a custodial interrogation to which subsection (a) applies;(ii) relies upon an exception under subsection (a)(2) or (e); and(iii) does not record electronically the custodial interrogation in its entirety.(2) If this subsection applies, the law enforcement officer shall prepare a written or electronic report:(i) explaining the reason for not recording the custodial interrogation; and(ii) summarizing the custodial interrogation process and the statements of the individual subject to the custodial interrogation.(c) Report timing.--A law enforcement officer shall prepare the report under subsection (b) as soon as practicable after completing the interrogation.(d) (Reserved).(e) Spontaneous and routine statements.--This section does not apply to:(1) a spontaneous statement made outside the course of a custodial interrogation; or(2) a statement made in response to a question asked routinely during the processing of the arrest of an individual.§ 1104. Notice and consent not required.20250SB0370PN0318 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Notwithstanding 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 57 Subch. B (relating to wire, electronic or oral communication), a law enforcement officer conducting a custodial interrogation is not required to obtain consent to electronic recording from the individual being interrogated. This chapter does not permit a law enforcement officer or a law enforcement agency to record a private communication between an individual and the individual's lawyer.§ 1105. Exception for exigent circumstances.Section 1103 (relating to electronic recording requirement) does not apply if electronic recording is not feasible because of exigent circumstances. The law enforcement officer conducting the interrogation shall record electronically an explanation of the exigent circumstances before conducting the interrogation, if feasible, or as soon as practicable after the interrogation is completed.§ 1106. Exception for individual's refusal to be recorded electronically.(a) Refusal to participate.--Section 1103 (relating to electronic recording requirement) does not apply if the individual to be interrogated indicates that the individual will not participate in the interrogation if the interrogation is recorded electronically. If feasible, the agreement to participate without recording must be recorded electronically.(b) Refusal to continue.--If, during a custodial interrogation under section 1103, the individual being interrogated indicates that the individual will not participate in further interrogation unless electronic recording ceases, the remainder of the custodial interrogation need not be recorded electronically. If feasible, the individual's agreement to participate without further recording must be recorded 20250SB0370PN0318 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electronically.(c) Encouraging refusal.--A law enforcement officer, with intent to avoid the requirement of electronic recording in section 1103, may not encourage an individual to request that a recording not be made.§ 1107. Exception for interrogation conducted by other jurisdiction.If a custodial interrogation occurs in another state in compliance with that state's law or is conducted by a Federal law enforcement agency in compliance with Federal law, the interrogation need not be recorded electronically unless the interrogation is conducted with intent to avoid the requirement of electronic recording in section 1103 (relating to electronic recording requirement).§ 1108. Exception based on belief recording not required.(a) Initial belief.--Section 1103 (relating to electronic recording requirement) does not apply if the interrogation occurs when no law enforcement officer conducting the custodial interrogation has knowledge of facts and circumstances that would lead an officer reasonably to believe that the individual being interrogated may have committed an act for which section 1103 requires that a custodial interrogation be recorded electronically.(b) Additional factors.--If, during a custodial interrogation under subsection (a), the individual being interrogated reveals facts and circumstances giving a law enforcement officer conducting the interrogation reason to believe that an act has been committed for which section 1103 requires that a custodial interrogation be recorded electronically, continued custodial interrogation concerning 20250SB0370PN0318 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that act must be recorded electronically, if feasible.§ 1109. Exception for safety of individual or protection of identity.Section 1103 (relating to electronic recording requirement) does not apply if a law enforcement officer conducting the interrogation or the officer's superior reasonably believes that electronic recording would disclose the identity of a confidential informant or jeopardize the safety of an officer, the individual being interrogated or another individual. If feasible and consistent with the safety of a confidential informant, an explanation of the basis for the belief that electronic recording would disclose the informant's identity must be recorded electronically at the time of the interrogation. If contemporaneous recording of the basis for the belief is not feasible, the recording must be made as soon as practicable after the interrogation is completed.§ 1110. Exception for equipment malfunction.(a) General malfunction.--Section 1103 (relating to electronic recording requirement) does not apply to the extent that an electronic recording is not feasible because:(1) the available electronic recording equipment fails, despite reasonable maintenance of the equipment; and(2) timely repair or replacement is not feasible.(b) Video only.--Recording may be by video alone if audio recording is not feasible under subsection (a).§ 1111. Burden of persuasion.If the prosecution relies on an exception under section 1103(a)(2) (relating to electronic recording requirement) to justify a failure to record electronically a custodial interrogation, the prosecution must prove by a preponderance of 20250SB0370PN0318 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the evidence that the exception applies.§ 1112. Notice of intent to introduce unrecorded statement.If the prosecution intends to introduce in its case-in-chief a statement made during a custodial interrogation subject to section 1103 (relating to electronic recording requirement) which was not recorded electronically, the prosecution, not later than 14 days after arraignment, must serve the defendant with written notice of the prosecution's intent and of any exception on which the prosecution intends to rely.§ 1113. Procedural remedies.(a) Admissibility.--Unless the court finds that an exception under section 1103(a)(2) (relating to electronic recording requirement) applies, the court shall consider the failure to record electronically all or part of a custodial interrogation subject to section 1103 in determining whether a statement made during the interrogation is admissible, including whether the statement was voluntarily made and is reliable.(b) Instruction.--If the court admits into evidence a statement made during a custodial interrogation that was not recorded electronically in compliance with section 1103, the court, on request of the defendant, shall give a cautionary instruction to the jury.§ 1114. Handling and preserving electronic recording.Each law enforcement agency in this Commonwealth shall establish and enforce procedures to ensure that the electronic recording of all or part of a custodial interrogation is identified, accessible and preserved as required by Pa.R.E. Art. X (relating to contents of writings, recordings, and photographs). The procedures shall be consistent with applicable provisions contained in the regulations under § 1115 (relating 20250SB0370PN0318 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to regulations relating to electronic recording). The Office of Attorney General shall monitor and enforce compliance with this section.§ 1115. Regulations relating to electronic recording.(a) Adoption and enforcement.--The Office of Attorney General shall:(1) in consultation with the Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police, promulgate regulations to implement this chapter; and(2) monitor enforcement of the regulations by each law enforcement agency which is a governmental entity of the Commonwealth.(b) Scope.--Regulations promulgated under subsection (a) shall address:(1) how an electronic recording of a custodial interrogation must be made;(2) the collection and review of electronic recordings, or the absence of electronic recordings, by a supervisor in each law enforcement agency;(3) the assignment of supervisory responsibilities and a chain of command to promote internal accountability;(4) a process for explaining noncompliance with procedures and imposing administrative sanctions for a failure to comply which is not justified;(5) a supervisory system expressly imposing on individuals in specific positions a duty to ensure adequate staffing, education, training and material resources to implement this chapter; and(6) a process for monitoring the chain of custody of an electronic recording.20250SB0370PN0318 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Video recording.--Regulations promulgated under subsections (a) and (b)(1) for video recording must contain standards for the angle, focus and field of vision of a recording device which reasonably promote accurate recording of a custodial interrogation and reliable assessment of the recording's accuracy and completeness.(d) Failure to comply with regulations.--A court may consider the failure by a law enforcement agency to comply with regulations promulgated under subsections (a) and (b)(1) in determining whether an individual's statement made during a custodial interrogation conducted by the law enforcement agency is admissible.(e) Temporary regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this chapter, the Office of Attorney General shall promulgate temporary regulations under this section. Promulgation of temporary regulations under this subsection shall not be subject to any of the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 20 4 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) Temporary regulations promulgated under this 20250SB0370PN0318 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection shall expire on the earlier of:(i) the effective date of regulations promulgated under subsection (a); or(ii) two years following the publication of the temporary regulations.(3) Paragraph (1) shall expire 180 days following the effective date of this section.§ 1116. Limitation of liability.(a) Immunity.--A law enforcement agency which is a governmental entity of the Commonwealth and has implemented procedures reasonably designed to comply with regulations adopted under section 1115 (relating to regulations relating to electronic recording) and to ensure compliance with this chapter is not subject to civil liability for damages arising from a violation of this chapter. This subsection is subject to 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 (relating to matters affecting government units).(b) No right of action.--This chapter does not create a right of action against a law enforcement officer.§ 1117. Self-authentication.(a) Certification.--In any pretrial or posttrial proceeding, an electronic recording of a custodial interrogation is self-authenticating if it is accompanied by a certificate of authenticity sworn under oath or affirmation by an appropriate law enforcement officer.(b) Challenges.--This chapter does not limit the right of an individual to challenge the authenticity of an electronic recording of a custodial interrogation under the laws of this Commonwealth other than this chapter.§ 1118. (Reserved).§ 1119. Uniformity of application and construction.20250SB0370PN0318 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.§ 1120. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.To the extent permitted by section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (Public Law 106-229, 15 U.S.C. § 7002), this chapter may supersede provisions of that act.Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of 44 Pa.C.S. § 1115 shall take effect immediately.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect on the effective date of the temporary regulations promulgated under 44 Pa.C.S. § 1115(e) or January 1, 2027, whichever is earlier.20250SB0370PN0318 - 13 - 1234567891011121314151617